Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.742

Submission of fingerprints taken from persons for noncriminal purposes—Fees.

The Washington state patrol shall adopt rules concerning submission of fingerprints taken by local agencies after July 26, 1987, from persons for license application or other noncriminal purposes. The Washington state patrol may charge fees for submission of fingerprints which will cover as nearly as practicable the direct and indirect costs to the Washington state patrol of processing such submission.

[ 1987 c 450 s 4.]